West Virginia, session 2026, HB4053.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3g. BLUE ENVELOPE PROGRAM. §15-3G-1.  Short title. This article shall be known as and may be cited as the "Blue Envelope Program".§15-3G-2.  Establishment of Blue Envelope Program. (a) By January 1, 2027, the State Police, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop the Blue Envelope Program to promote better communication between law enforcement and community members with a medical condition or disability that may benefit from additional accommodations or awareness. (b) The State Police shall develop and implement a program for the promotion, printing, and distribution of envelopes for use by drivers diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder, dementia, or any intellectual and developmental disability to provide to a law enforcement officer for the purpose of easing communication during a traffic stop or upon such law enforcement officer’s arrival at the scene of a traffic accident.§15-3G-3.  Program materials. (a) The Blue Envelope Program shall provide durable, blue-colored envelopes to persons with autism spectrum disorder, dementia, or intellectual and developmental disabilities.(b) The State Police shall make Blue Envelope Program materials available by mail and at every State Police detachment and county motor vehicle office.(c) The blue envelopes shall:(1) Clearly state that the driver has been diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder, dementia, or intellectual and developmental disability and have printed directions for law enforcement officers on best practices for interacting with such driver with traffic stop safety tips;(2) Provide space for more information to be written about the driver’s communication needs and recommendations to the responding law enforcement officer with interaction techniques to help promote enhanced communication and accommodation between law enforcement and community members to effectively communicate, reduce stress, and ensure safe interactions with law enforcement;(3) Have a blank area where the driver, or their emergency contact, may add noteworthy comments pertaining to the driver’s individual needs or requested accommodations and where the driver may write down the contact information of his or her emergency contact person;(4) Be of sufficient size to fit into the glove compartment of a motor vehicle and be able to hold a driver’s license, vehicle registration card, vehicle insurance card, and other related documents; and,(5) Have printed directions instructing the driver to place his or her proof of vehicle registration and insurance in the envelope and provide such envelope and his or her driver’s license to law enforcement if he or she is ever involved in a traffic stop or traffic accident.  §15-3G-4.  Collection and storage of information. The State Police shall not collect or store information identifying any person who has requested or received such an envelope, except any information necessary to distribute such an envelope to the requestor.  No such information shall be stored in any form after the distribution of such envelope is complete.§15-3G-5.  State Police verification of information not required; no warranty or liability. Nothing in this article requires the State Police to verify any information provided on the envelope. Any action taken by a person, whether private citizen or public officer or employee, with regard to any information provided on the envelope shall neither create a warranty of the reliability or accuracy of the document nor create any liability on the part of the State of West Virginia or any department, office, or agency or of any officer, employee or agent thereof.§15-3G-6.  Immunity from civil or criminal liability; exception. No person or entity who in good faith follows and abides by the provisions of this article may be liable for any civil or criminal penalty as the result of any act or omission in the furtherance thereof unless it is alleged and proven that the information disclosed was false and disclosed with the knowledge that the information was false. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home